Arkansas, session 2025, HB1224.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-7-106 is amended to read as follows:
17-7-106. Exemptions.
(a) This chapter does not apply to licensure or certification of:
(1) Medical Except as provided in subsection (c) of this
section, medical professions under Title 17, Subtitle 3;
(2) Legal professionals; or
(3) Individuals under reciprocity agreements.
(b) This chapter does not apply to an existing multistate or
interstate compact if the chapter would result in a nullification of the
multistate or interstate compact.
(c) This chapter applies to massage therapists licensed under the
Massage Therapy Act, § 17-86-101 et seq.
*JMB256*
01/24/2025 12:23:34 PM JMB256